Hawaii statutes.
§435C-8 Privileged communications.
There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any
nature shall arise against the plan, its agents or employees, an insurer, any
producer, or the insurance commissioner or the commissioner's authorized
representatives, for any statements made in good faith by them in any reports
or communications concerning risks insured or to be insured by the plan, or at
any administrative hearing conducted in connection therewith. [L 1975, c 161,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2002, c 155, §106]

Cross References

Required reports privileged by statute, see §626-1, rule 502.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next